Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,228
Forcible entry and detainer; verdict; entry; judgment.

The court shall enter the verdict upon the record and shall render such judgment in the action as if the facts authorizing the finding of such verdict had been found to be true by the court.

Laws 1929, c. 82, § 127, p. 311;

C.S.1929, § 22-1211;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,128;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 78;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-578;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 34.